RStudio/dictionaries/languages-system/da_DK.dic
Dennis/ASm
Ian/AJQRm
Josephin/AQm
Laurentius/ASm
Lavritz/ASm
Liz/ABSm
Lukas/ASm
Marcel/ARm
Marcus/ASm
Martinus/ASm
Mathis/ASm
Matthæus/ASm
Max/ASm
Milos/ASm
Nelas/ASm
Nicodemus/ASm
Nikolaus/ASm
Octavius/ASm
Rass/ASm
Roselil/ARm
Selius/ASm
Sinius/ASm
Tais/ASm
Tex/ASm
Thomas/ASm
Tommas/ASm
Tønnes/ASm
Unn/AQm
Vincens/ASm
Zakarias/ASm
abc/SUVm
administrere/ACWXcdfm
afblanke/ACWXcfm
afbræk/ALRm
affjedre/ACWXfm
afise/CWYcm
afkalkningsmiddel/ABNPm
afkappe/ACWXfm
aflevere/ACWXcm
afmatte/ACWXabfm
afpasse/ACWXZbm
afprøve/ACWYcm
afskridte/ACWXYcfm
afspise/Yem
aftager/AFJQm
aksel/AFOPkm
aktantmodel/AGMm
amatørorkester/ANORm
amfiteater/ANORm
amortisere/ACWXfm
amperemeter/ANORm
anfægte/ACWXacm
angriber/AFJQm
anmode/ACWYcm
antikvitetshandel/Pm
antilogaritme/AGMWm
asen/ABHNPXm
askebæger/ABJKNOQRm
assimilere/ACWXcdfm
asylcenter/ABNORm
atomisk/Qm
australneger/AFORm
b/BFSTV
baggrundsfarve/AGMWm
bagtæppe/ACDMWm
barnekammer/ABNORm
barsel/OPkm
bartender/AFJQm
beflyve/ACWYcfm
befugte/CMWXYcfm
begrebsverden/AFHPm
behandle/ACMWXcfm
bemærke/ACWXYacm
bereden/CXm
beredskabslager/ABNORm
beskinne/ACWXbfm
besørge/ACWXacfm
betænke/AWYcehm
bh/SUVm
bindsel/ABNPm
blokke/ACGJWXZbfm
blomsterløs/CQm
blot/ABHMRm
blæksprutte/AGMWm
blødtvandsfilter/ABNORm
bolværksbille/AGMWm
bortvise/AYem
brugskunsten/APm
brum/EGMRm
bræddestabel/AFOPm
brødmaskine/AGMWm
bugne/ACWXbcm
busk/AFKQm
butikscenter/ABNORm
byge/ACGMWYbcm
båre/ACGMWm
bøn/AGJMRm
c/STV
cafeteater/ANORm
cancerregister/ANORm
cellefængsel/ANPm
cistercienserkloster/ANORm
compose/Wm
d/BFQSTV
damecykel/Om
deponere/ACWXcm
desinficeringsmiddel/ANPm
detailhandler/AFJQm
diagnose/AGMWm
digte/ACDJMWYbcm
diplomprøve/AGMWm
drivanker/ANORm
dukketeater/ANORm
dvd/SUVm
dørklokke/AGMWm
e/ACGJSTVWf
eksamensfeber/AFORm
eksempel/ANPm
eksperimentalteater/ANORm
ekstrafortjeneste/AGMWm
elgkalv/AFKQm
energiminister/AFORm
eskortere/ACWXbcm
etageadskillelse/AGMWm
f/QSTV
fantasifoster/ANORm
fedttæt/Rm
figurfrakke/AGMWm
fiskehandel/Pm
fisker/ABFJQm
fjernsynstale/AGMWm
flik/GMRm
flænse/ACMWYcm
fodermester/AFORm
forbruske/ACWXYcm
forfejle/CWcm
forkortelsesliste/AGMWm
forskrive/Ym
forsvarsminister/AFORm
forsøgscenter/ANORm
fradrage/ACDJWcm
frankere/CWXcm
fremgang/AFKQm
fugleskræmsel/ANPm
fægtemester/AFORm
fælde/ACGMWYbcm
g/FSTV
galdestenssmerte/AGMWm
galvanometer/ANORm
gangetabel/AGMm
glæde/ACGMWXcm
grej/ABHQm
grim/CRm
gruse/CWYbcm
h/STV
halvsøster/AFORm
handel/AFOPkm
haspe/ACGMWYbcm
hjemrejse/AGMWm
hofdame/AGMWm
hygrometer/ANORm
håndtere/ACWXcm
hæmningsløs/CQm
i/ASTVWX
indkøbscenter/ABNORm
indskibe/CWYcm
industricenter/ABNORm
j/BSTV
jamme/ACWXbm
jule/ACGJWcm
junglefeber/AFORm
juvelerbutik/AGMm
k/STV
kapitel/ANPm
klaver/ABHRm
kloakmester/AFORm
klokkestreng/AFKQm
kolbøtte/AGMWm
koncentrere/ACWXcm
kreere/CWcm
kulturcenter/ABNORm
kursuscenter/ANORm
kvæle/AWYfm
l/QSTV
lager/ABJRm
landhandel/Pm
ledsagebåd/AFKQm
legatbestyrelse/AGMWm
lempe/ACWXYabcm
lillesøster/AFORm
lsd/TUm
m/FKSTV
mahognimøbel/ANPm
mariehøne/AGMWm
materialprøve/AGMWYm
mejsel/OPkm
menopause/AGMWm
mester/AFORm
militærnægter/AFJQm
miljøminister/AFORm
miste/ACWXbm
modtagecenter/ABNORm
møbel/ABNPm
mønster/ABNORm
n/BSTV
o/ASTVX
områdecenter/ABNORm
omstyrte/CWYcm
opdyrke/CWYcm
opholdsstue/AGMWm
overise/Ym
p/FSTVW
padderok/GMRm
pakæsel/ANPm
palæstinenser/AFJQm
pengeoverførsel/AFOPm
pensel/OPkm
pin/CFHQXm
prisforhøjelse/AGMWm
probere/CWcm
q/STV
r/BFSTV
reaumurtermometer/ANORm
register/ANORm
rettighedshaver/AFJQm
reven/OPm
rigel/OPkm
rinke/CWYcm
rotterede/AGMWm
ruskregne/CWcm
rælingsanker/ANORm
s/JKQTV
sagsregister/ANORm
sandblæse/MWYm
sekteriker/AFJQm
semester/ANORm
shantungsfrakke/AGMWm
skiffer/AFJOQRm
skimmel/OPkm
skonæse/AGMWm
skorstensfejermester/AFORm
skrælle/ACGMWbm
skuddag/AFKQm
skydepotentiometer/ANORm
skygge/ACGMWXZbm
slæde/ACGMWYcm
smergel/OPkm
snørkel/OPkm
solistværelse/ACDMWm
spaltegulvsstald/AFKQm
spiger/AFJOQRm
sportsstævne/ACDMWm
stalinorgel/ANPm
standardeksempel/ANPm
stedsøster/AFORm
stilemne/ACDMWm
stråtag/ABKQm
styrte/ACDJWYbcm
støjfilter/ANORm
sut/AEGLMRm
svejsemester/AFORm
svindel/OPkm
sydside/AGMWm
sygeleje/ACDMWm
t/FHKQSTV
tag/ABKQm
tildigte/CWYcm
tilløbsstykke/ACDMWm
trafikminister/AFORm
tredjebehandle/CWcm
trempeltag/ABKQm
træ/ABCHJXm
turnéteater/ANORm
tyggeflade/AGMWm
tyttebær/AEMOm
tøffel/AOPm
u/STVWm
udbløde/Yem
udplante/CWYcm
udtolke/Ym
underlæbe/AGMWm
urfjeder/AFORm
urmager/AFJQm
v/FKQSTV
varmekasse/AGMWm
viktualiehandel/Pm
w/STV
x/STV
y/STVX
z/FSTV
æ/CDSTVWX
øjeåbner/AFJQm
ørefigen/AFHOPm
øvelseslokale/ACDMWm
